Hawaii statutes.
[§343-5.5] Exception to
applicability of chapter. (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, for any primary action that requires a permit or approval that is not
subject to a discretionary consent and that involves a secondary action that is
ancillary and limited to the installation, improvement, renovation,
construction, or development of infrastructure within an existing public
right-of-way or highway, that secondary action shall be exempt from this
chapter; provided that the applicant for the primary action shall submit
documentation from the appropriate agency confirming that no further
discretionary approvals are required.

(b) As used in this section:

"Discretionary consent" means:

(1) An action as defined in section 343-2; or

(2) An approval from a decision-making authority in
an agency, which approval is subject to a public hearing.

"Infrastructure" includes waterlines
and water facilities, wastewater lines and wastewater facilities, gas lines and
gas facilities, drainage facilities, electrical, communications, telephone, and
cable television utilities, and highway, roadway, and driveway improvements.

"Primary action" means an action
outside of the highway or public right-of-way that is on private property.

"Secondary action" means an action
involving infrastructure within the highway or public right-of-way. [L 2012, c
312, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next